Florida, session 2026, SB1020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 125.573, Florida Statutes, is created to 23 read: 24 125.573âOrdinances, regulations, and policies concerning 25 chickees.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âchickeeâ has the 27 same meaning as in s. 553.73(10)(i). 28 (2)âA county may not enact an ordinance, a regulation, or a 29 policy: 30 (a)âThat prevents or has the effect of preventing a chickee 31 from being constructed in a side yard, provided the chickee is 32 at least 10 feet from any property line, or near another 33 structure, provided the chickee is at least 10 feet from the 34 other structure; or 35 (b)âThat concerns chickees and is more restrictive than 36 federal floodplain management regulations. 37 Section 2.âSection 166.0487, Florida Statutes, is created 38 to read: 39 166.0487âOrdinances, regulations, and policies concerning 40 chickees.â 41 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âchickeeâ has the 42 same meaning as in s. 553.73(10)(i). 43 (2)âA municipality may not enact an ordinance, a 44 regulation, or a policy: 45 (a)âThat prevents or has the effect of preventing a chickee 46 from being constructed in a side yard, provided the chickee is 47 at least 10 feet from any property line, or near another 48 structure, provided the chickee is at least 10 feet from the 49 other structure; or 50 (b)âThat concerns chickees and is more restrictive than 51 federal floodplain management regulations. 52 Section 3.âParagraph (i) of subsection (10) of section 53 553.73, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 54 553.73âFlorida Building Code.â 55 (10)âThe following buildings, structures, and facilities 56 are exempt from the Florida Building Code as provided by law, 57 and any further exemptions shall be as determined by the 58 Legislature and provided by law: 59 (i)âChickees constructed by the Miccosukee Tribe of Indians 60 of Florida or the Seminole Tribe of Florida. 61 1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âchickeeâ means an 62 open-sided wooden hut that has a thatched roof of palm or 63 palmetto or other traditional materials, and that does not 64 incorporate any electrical, plumbing, or other nonwood features. 65 A chickee may include a wooden deck and may incorporate nonwood 66 fasteners, including, but not limited to, nails, screws, bolts, 67 nuts, washers, staples, and hurricane straps. 68 2.âThe later incorporation of any electrical, plumbing, or 69 other nonwood feature into an existing chickee requires a permit 70 but may not be construed to affect the exempt status of or 71 require a permit for the chickee. 72 3.âA person who is not a member of the Miccosukee Tribe of 73 Indians of Florida or the Seminole Tribe of Florida and who 74 constructs a chickee in an attempt to circumvent the Florida 75 Building Code commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 76 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 77 78 With the exception of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (f), in 79 order to preserve the health, safety, and welfare of the public, 80 the Florida Building Commission may, by rule adopted pursuant to 81 chapter 120, provide for exceptions to the broad categories of 82 buildings exempted in this section, including exceptions for 83 application of specific sections of the code or standards 84 adopted therein. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer 85 Services shall have exclusive authority to adopt by rule, 86 pursuant to chapter 120, exceptions to nonresidential farm 87 buildings exempted in paragraph (c) when reasonably necessary to 88 preserve public health, safety, and welfare. The exceptions must 89 be based upon specific criteria, such as under-roof floor area, 90 aggregate electrical service capacity, HVAC system capacity, or 91 other building requirements. Further, the commission may 92 recommend to the Legislature additional categories of buildings, 93 structures, or facilities which should be exempted from the 94 Florida Building Code, to be provided by law. The Florida 95 Building Code does not apply to temporary housing provided by 96 the Department of Corrections to any prisoner in the state 97 correctional system. 98 Section 4.âSubsection (22) is added to section 633.202, 99 Florida Statutes, to read: 100 633.202âFlorida Fire Prevention Code.â 101 (22)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âchickeeâ has 102 the same meaning as in s. 553.73(10)(i). 103 (b)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a chickee 104 that is at least 20 feet from any other structure subject to the 105 Florida Building Code or that otherwise includes fireproofing 106 measures approved by a certified fire protection system 107 contractor is exempt from the Florida Fire Prevention Code. 108 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.